Utah statutes.
13-5-16.   Separability clause.
If any section, sentence, clause or phrase of this act is for any reason held
to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the
remaining portions of the act. The Legislature hereby declares that it would
have passed this act, and each section, sentence, clause or phrase thereof,
irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, sentences,
clauses or phrases be declared unconstitutional.
